src/fst/morphology/compounding.lexc
!! #Inari Saami compounding
!      =======================

LEXICON Rhash !!≈ @CODE@ - adding lower # and pointing at R
 :#  R ;

LEXICON R !!≈ @CODE@ -  Flags to control compounding
 @P.CmpFrst.FALSE@@P.CmpPref.FALSE@@D.CmpLast.TRUE@@D.CmpNone.TRUE@@U.CmpNone.FALSE@@P.CmpOnly.TRUE@ RAlmostReal ; 

LEXICON  Rnoun !!≈ @CODE@ - 
               :#  Rreal ; ! pessijâšmoonijd
 +Attr+Err/Orth:    K ; ! pessijâš


LEXICON RAlmostReal    !!≈ @CODE@ -  lexicalising the 3-part compounds, with the tag ShCmp
         RrealAfterCmpNFlags ; ! Normal compounds right on to RrealAfterCmpNFlags, without going via Rreal flags (!)
 +Cmp#:# MiddleNouns ;         ! These nouns should not return to themselves, to avoid -jotjotjot-


LEXICON Rreal !!≈ @CODE@ - This initial recursive/compounding lexicon adds flags to 
              !! control compounding, before going to the real compounding lexicon.
	      !! This is the former R lexicon, renamed to avoid the MiddleNouns loop
 @P.CmpFrst.FALSE@@P.CmpPref.FALSE@@D.CmpLast.TRUE@@D.CmpNone.TRUE@@U.CmpNone.FALSE@@P.CmpOnly.TRUE@ RrealAfterCmpNFlags ; 


LEXICON RrealAfterCmpNFlags !!≈ @CODE@ - coming from Rreal
          +Cmp#:#  nounflag       ; ! to flags and root lexica
 +Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#:#- nounflag       ; ! to flags and root lexica via hyphen
         +Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#:#- ProperNoun-smn ; ! to smn propernouns
         +Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#:#- ProperNoun     ; ! to other propernouns 
    +Cmp/SplitR+Cmp:-  #              ; ! split forms
!         +Cmp#:#  #              ; ! For turning off compounding during testing

LEXICON nounflag !!≈ @CODE@ -  coming from previous, going to the Root lexica
                 NounRoot      ; ! N+N always ok
		 LastNouns     ; ! XXX Now this has one noun only, a better way is +CmpNP/Last
 @P.NeedNoun.ON@ VerbRoot      ; ! means that the form is only allowed when it encounters @C.NeedNoun@, because of ENDLEX @D.NeedNoun.ON@
 @P.NeedNoun.ON@ AdjectiveRoot ; ! id.


LEXICON RHyph !!≈ @CODE@ - This initial recursive/compounding lexicon adds flags to
              !! control compounding, before going to the real compounding lexicon
 @U.Cap.Obl@@P.CmpFrst.FALSE@@P.CmpPref.FALSE@@D.CmpLast.TRUE@@D.CmpNone.TRUE@@U.CmpNone.FALSE@@P.CmpOnly.TRUE@ RHyph_after_cmp_flags ;

LEXICON RHyph_after_cmp_flags !!≈ @CODE@ - from RHyph
      +Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#:-# NounRoot ;
      +Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#:-# Numeral  ; ! NRK-2
 +Cmp/SplitR+Cmp:-  #        ;
 +Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#:#- nounflag       ; ! to flags and root lexica via hyphen
         +Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#:#- ProperNoun-smn ; ! to smn propernouns
         +Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#:#- ProperNoun     ; ! to other propernouns 

LEXICON RProp !!≈ @CODE@ - This initial recursive/compounding lexicon adds flags to
              !! control compounding, before going to the real compounding lexicon
 @U.Cap.Obl@@P.CmpFrst.FALSE@@P.CmpPref.FALSE@@D.CmpLast.TRUE@@D.CmpNone.TRUE@@U.CmpNone.FALSE@@P.CmpOnly.TRUE@ RProp_after_cmp_flags ;

LEXICON RProp_after_cmp_flags                  !!≈ - @CODE@ from RProp
!      +Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#nommâ:»»»-nommâs  DER-SAS        ; ! Jovnâ-nommâsâš
     +Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#merkkâ:»»»-merkkâs DER-SAS        ; ! Saab-merkkâsâš
           +Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#:-#          ProperNoun     ;
           +Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#:-#          ProperNoun-smn ;
           +Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#:-#          NounRoot       ;
 @D.CmpHyph.TRUE@+Use/-Spell+Cmp#:@D.CmpHyph.TRUE@#  NounRoot  ; ! We don't want Proper-Noun compounds without hyphen in the speller.
      +Cmp/SplitR+Cmp:-           #              ;

LEXICON RNum !!≈ @CODE@ - This initial recursive/compounding lexicon adds flags to
             !! control compounding, before going to the real compounding lexicon
 @P.CmpFrst.FALSE@@P.CmpPref.FALSE@@D.CmpLast.TRUE@@D.CmpNone.TRUE@@U.CmpNone.FALSE@@P.CmpOnly.TRUE@ RNum_after_cmp_flags ;

LEXICON RNum_after_cmp_flags !!≈ @CODE@ - going to Noun, should it be to NounRoot?
 +Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#:-# Noun ; ! For Num Cmp Noun, vi vil ikke ha Num Cmp Num
